Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska37-713
State Wild Game Preserve; special permits for taking surplus wild game animals; issuance.

Whenever the number of wild game animals on the State Wild Game Preserve increases beyond the practical carrying capacity of the land involved, and no disposal of such animals to the public parks of the State of Nebraska is practical, the commission is hereby authorized to issue special permits for the taking of such surplus animals and to provide by regulation fees for such special permits and regulate methods and conditions of taking. Such special permits shall be distributed by an impartial manner, by lot.

Laws 1959, c. 150, § 10, p. 575;

R.S.1943, (1993), § 37-401.01;

Laws 1998, LB 922, § 327.